Hawaii statutes.
[§661B-6] Waiver
of sovereign immunity. This chapter shall constitute a waiver of sovereign
immunity by the State only for the claims brought pursuant to this chapter. The
State makes no other waiver of sovereign immunity, and fully retains its
sovereign immunity as to all other claims, however denominated, that seek compensation
of any kind or nature that are a result of, related to, or arise from a
conviction and imprisonment for crimes for which the claimant alleges actual
innocence. This section shall be broadly construed in favor of the State and
against any waiver of sovereign immunity. [L 2016, c 156, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next